Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201890-554
Transfer to General Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer $150,000 from the Convention Center Support Fund to the General Fund on July 1, 2015, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 13.